Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2605
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Quality Child Care Act:

(1) Child care shall mean the care and supervision of children in lieu of parental care and supervision and shall include programs; and

(2) Programs shall mean the programs listed in subdivision (2) of section 71-1910.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 148.